Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3505.04
Single-family residential property, defined.

Single-family residential property shall mean all real property with dwellings designed for occupancy by one family or duplexes designed for occupancy by two families.

Laws 1994, LB 902, § 31.